Maine, session 132, LD724.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §1051, as repealed and replaced by PL 2021, c. 676, Pt. A, §2, is
amended to read:
§1051. Legal holidays
Court may not be held on Sunday or any day designated for the annual Thanksgiving;
Eid al-Fitr, as designated by the Governor under Title 5, section 60; Eid al-Adha, as
designated by the Governor under Title 5, section 61; New Year's Day, January 1st; Martin
Luther King, Jr., Day, the 3rd Monday in January; Washington's Birthday, the 3rd Monday
in February; Patriot's Day, the 3rd Monday in April; Memorial Day, the last Monday in
May, but if the Federal Government designates May 30th as the date for observance of
Memorial Day, the 30th of May; Juneteenth, June 19th; the 4th of July; Labor Day, the first
Monday of September; Indigenous Peoples Day, the 2nd Monday in October; Veterans
Day, November 11th; or on Christmas Day. The Chief Justice of the Supreme Judicial
Court may order that court be held on a legal holiday when the Chief Justice finds that the
interests of justice and judicial economy in any particular case will be served. The public
offices in county buildings may be closed to business on the holidays named in this section.
When any one of the holidays named in this section falls on Sunday, the Monday following
must be observed as a holiday, with all the privileges applying to any of the days named in
this section.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §60 is enacted to read:
§60. Eid al-Fitr established as state holiday
Eid al-Fitr is established as a state holiday. All nonessential state offices must be closed
on Eid al-Fitr. The Governor shall designate each year the specific date of the state holiday
under this section.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §61 is enacted to read:
§61. Eid al-Adha established as state holiday
Eid al-Adha is established as a state holiday. All nonessential state offices must be
closed on Eid al-Adha. The Governor shall designate each year the specific date of the
state holiday under this section.
Sec. 4. 9-B MRSA §145, sub-§1, ¶A-1 is enacted to read:
A-1. Eid al-Fitr, as designated by the Governor under Title 5, section 60;
Sec. 5. 9-B MRSA §145, sub-§1, ¶A-2 is enacted to read:
A-2. Eid al-Adha, as designated by the Governor under Title 5, section 61;
Sec. 6. 20-A MRSA §4802, sub-§1, ¶H, as amended by PL 1985, c. 787, §5, is
further amended to read:
H. Christmas Day, December 25th; and
Sec. 7. 20-A MRSA §4802, sub-§1, ¶I, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 787, §6, is
amended to read:
I. Martin Luther King, Jr. Day, the 3rd Monday in January.;
Page 1 - 132LR1354(01)

Sec. 8. 20-A MRSA §4802, sub-§1, ¶J is enacted to read:
J. Eid al-Fitr, as designated by the Governor under Title 5, section 60; and
Sec. 9. 20-A MRSA §4802, sub-§1, ¶K is enacted to read:
K. Eid al-Adha, as designated by the Governor under Title 5, section 61.